dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
    <pardef n="gravam/en__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>enet</l><r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ina</l><r>en<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mor/gon__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>gonen</l><r>gon<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nar</l><r>gon<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>gnar</l><r>gon<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>gnarna</l><r>gon<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>narna</l><r>gon<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>gon</l><r>gon<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fä__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>t</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>na</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="scar/f__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>fen</l><r>f<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>f</l><r>f<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>farna</l><r>f<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>vesen</l><r>f<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ves</l><r>f<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>far</l><r>f<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gag__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sen</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="oro__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>rna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>arna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ar</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>r</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="r/and__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l>anden</l><r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>and</l><r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>and</l><r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>änder</l><r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>anden</l><r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>änderna</l><r>and<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="altar/e__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>na</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ackordi/on__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>on</l><r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>er</l><r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>erna</l><r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>on</l><r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>onet</l><r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>et</l><r>on<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gyllen__n_un">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gem__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>men</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>merna</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>mer</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="makadam__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>men</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cashew__n_ut">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>en</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>n</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>sen</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
      <e><p>          <l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="Ø__case"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="teach-in"><i>teach-in</i><par n="gyllen__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="sto"><i>sto</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="kvitten"><i>kvitten</i><par n="gyllen__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="nmajmorgon"><i>nmajmor</i><par n="mor/gon__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="spö"><i>spö</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="torsdagsmorgon"><i>torsdagsmor</i><par n="mor/gon__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="smultronstrå"><i>smultronstrå</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="kraftparallellogram"><i>kraftparallellogram</i><par n="gem__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="morgon"><i>mor</i><par n="mor/gon__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="baseballsträ"><i>baseballsträ</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="skäggstrå"><i>skäggstrå</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="juldagsmorgon"><i>juldagsmor</i><par n="mor/gon__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="hårstrå"><i>hårstrå</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="makadam"><i>makadam</i><par n="makadam__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="okynnesfä"><i>okynnesfä</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="lördagsmorgon"><i>lördagsmor</i><par n="mor/gon__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="ackordion"><i>ackordi</i><par n="ackordi/on__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="scarf"><i>scar</i><par n="scar/f__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="halmstrå"><i>halmstrå</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="busksly"><i>busksly</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="fä"><i>fä</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="basebollsträ"><i>basebollsträ</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="mähä"><i>mähä</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="fredagsmorgon"><i>fredagsmor</i><par n="mor/gon__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="flygfä"><i>flygfä</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="vinkelknä"><i>vinkelknä</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="söndagsmorgon"><i>söndagsmor</i><par n="mor/gon__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="grässtrå"><i>grässtrå</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="baseballträ"><i>baseballträ</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="gem"><i>gem</i><par n="gem__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="kastträ"><i>kastträ</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="rand"><i>r</i><par n="r/and__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="pimpelspö"><i>pimpelspö</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="vedträ"><i>vedträ</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="strå"><i>strå</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="parallellogram"><i>parallellogram</i><par n="gem__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="sällträ"><i>sällträ</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="måndagsmorgon"><i>måndagsmor</i><par n="mor/gon__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="roddarmadam"><i>roddarmadam</i><par n="gem__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="knä"><i>knä</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="majmorgon"><i>majmor</i><par n="mor/gon__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="snapshot"><i>snapshot</i><par n="gag__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="madam"><i>madam</i><par n="gem__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="cashew"><i>cashew</i><par n="cashew__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="gravamen"><i>gravam</i><par n="gravam/en__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="metspö"><i>metspö</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="slagträ"><i>slagträ</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="gyllen"><i>gyllen</i><par n="gyllen__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="sidoaltare"><i>sidoaltar</i><par n="altar/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="fjäderfä"><i>fjäderfä</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="fölsto"><i>fölsto</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="onsdagsmorgon"><i>onsdagsmor</i><par n="mor/gon__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="jojo"><i>jojo</i><par n="oro__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="luciamorgon"><i>luciamor</i><par n="mor/gon__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="spinnspö"><i>spinnspö</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="väggmadam"><i>väggmadam</i><par n="gem__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="mjau"><i>mjau</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="altare"><i>altar</i><par n="altar/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="klappträ"><i>klappträ</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="tisdagsmorgon"><i>tisdagsmor</i><par n="mor/gon__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="sly"><i>sly</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="sovmorgon"><i>sovmor</i><par n="mor/gon__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="högaltare"><i>högaltar</i><par n="altar/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="bollträ"><i>bollträ</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="kastspö"><i>kastspö</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="gag"><i>gag</i><par n="gag__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="basebollträ"><i>basebollträ</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="oro"><i>oro</i><par n="oro__n_ut"/></e>
    <e lm="grågyllen"><i>grågyllen</i><par n="gyllen__n_un"/></e>
    <e lm="fäste"><i>fäste</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ridspö"><i>ridspö</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
